Hawaii statutes.
§134-10 Alteration of identification marks
prohibited. No person shall wilfully alter, remove, or obliterate the name
of the make, model, manufacturer's number, or other mark of identity of any
firearm or ammunition. Possession of a firearm or ammunition upon which any
mark of identity has been altered, removed, or obliterated shall be presumptive
evidence that the possessor has altered, removed, or obliterated the mark of
identity. [L 1988, c 275, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next